Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.090

Bond—Additional security.

The defendant may, at any time before judgment, move the court or judge for additional security on the part of the plaintiff, or for security if none was required under RCW 6.25.080, and if, on such motion, the court or judge is satisfied that security or additional security should be required or that the surety in the plaintiff's bond has removed from this state or is not sufficient, the attachment may be vacated, and restitution directed of any property taken under it, unless in a reasonable time, to be fixed by the court or judge, further security is given by the plaintiff in form as provided in RCW 6.25.080.

[ 1987 c 442 s 809; 1886 p 40 s 7; RRS s 653. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.070.]